apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="/su__det" c="p.25">
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>su</l>    <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>sa</l>    <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>su</l>        <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sa</l>        <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="sep"><p><l>sos</l>       <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="sep"><p><l>sas</l>       <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="mer"><p><l>is</l>        <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL" v="mer"><p><l>is</l> <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL" v="mer"><p><l>is</l> <r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tot/u__predet" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e> <!-- totu sa die, totu sas dies -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="/unu__det" c="p.25">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unu</l>       <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>una</l>       <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d-una</l>     <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>unu</l>   <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>una</l>   <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unus</l>      <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>unos</l>      <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unas</l>      <r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nessun/u__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bintun/u__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ogni__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="carchi__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="amb/os__det" c="p.27 /105">
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>os<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>os<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aduas</l>     <r>os<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="amb/os_duos__det">
  <e>       <p><l>as<b/>duas</l><r>os<b/>duos<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os<b/>duos</l><r>os<b/>duos<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="issoro__det" c="p.29">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="issoro__adj" c="p.29">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="issoro__prn" c="p.29">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tale__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="perun/u__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nu</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cust/u__det" c="p.30">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="àter/u__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vàri/u__det" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>u<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="un/u_àteru__det" c="">
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>ateru</l> <r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>u<b/>ateru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a<b/>atera</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>os<b/>ateros</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as<b/>ateras</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>àteru</l> <r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>u<b/>àteru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>àtera</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os<b/>àteros</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as<b/>àteras</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 

<e lm="issoro">          <i>issoro</i><par n="issoro__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="issoro" c="!LSC"><p><l>issoru</l><r>issoro</r></p><par n="issoro__prn"/></e>
<e lm="issoro">          <i>issoro</i><par n="issoro__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="issoro" c="!LSC"><p><l>issoru</l><r>issoro</r></p><par n="issoro__adj"/></e>
<e lm="su">              <i></i><par n="/su__det"/></e>
<e lm="unu">             <i></i><par n="/unu__det"/></e>
<e lm="àteru">           <i></i><par n="à/a"/><i>ter</i><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="ambos">           <i>amb</i><par n="amb/os__det"/></e>
<e lm="ambos duos">      <i>amb</i><par n="amb/os_duos__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="carchi">   <p><l>archi</l>     <r>carchi</r></p><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="àteru" c="!LSC"><p><l>artr</l> <r>àter</r></p><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="àteru" c="!LSC"><p><l>ater</l> <r>àter</r></p><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="àteru" c="!LSC"><p><l>atr</l>  <r>àter</r></p><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="àteru" c="!LSC"><p><l>atter</l><r>àter</r></p><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="cada">            <i>cada</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="carchi">   <p><l>calchi</l>    <r>carchi</r></p><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
<e lm="carchi">          <i>carchi</i><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="carchi">   <p><l>charchi</l>   <r>carchi</r></p><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
<e lm="cuddu">           <i>cudd</i><par n="cust/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="cussu">           <i>cuss</i><par n="cust/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="custu">           <i>cust</i><par n="cust/u__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>dd-onnya</l>  <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e lm="diversu">         <i>divers</i><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="tzertu">          <par n="tz/c"/><i>ert</i><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="calicunu">        <i>calicun</i><par n="àter/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="issoro">          <i>issoro</i><par n="issoro__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="issoro" c="!LSC"><p><l>issoru</l><r>issoro</r></p><par n="issoro__det"/></e>
<e lm="nisciunu">        <i>nisciun</i><par n="perun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="niunu">           <i>niun</i><par n="perun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="ogni">            <i>ogni</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>ongi</l>      <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>onni</l>      <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>onnia</l>     <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>onnya</l>     <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>onzi</l>      <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e lm="perunu">          <i>perun</i><par n="perun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="tale">            <i>tale</i><par n="tale__det"/></e>
<e lm="unu àteru">       <i>un</i><par n="un/u_àteru__det"/></e>
<e lm="vàriu">           <i>v</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ri</i><par n="vàri/u__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ogni">     <p><l>ònni</l>      <r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
<e lm="nessunu">         <i>nessun</i><par n="nessun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="bintunu">         <i>bintun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="trintunu">        <i>trintun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="barantunu">       <i>barantun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="chimbantunu">     <i>chimbantun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="sesantunu">       <i>sesantun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="setantunu">       <i>setantun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="otantunu">        <i>otantun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="norantunu">       <i>norantun</i><par n="bintun/u__det"/></e>
<e lm="totu">            <i>tot</i><par n="tot/u__predet"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="totu" c="!LSC"><p><l>tott</l>  <r>tot</r></p><par n="tot/u__predet"/></e>
